District of Columbia statutes.
Expired

47-1411

Imposition of excise tax

[Expired].

Expiration of subchapter: Due to a sunset provision contained in § 47-1411(d), the residential real property transfer excise tax imposed by this subchapter applied only during the 3-year period after July 13, 1978, and during the period of effectiveness of D.C. Act 4-60, which was approved on July 20, 1981, and remained in effect for no longer than 90 days. The deletion of the provisions of this subchapter is not intended to affect any existing legal rights or obligations.

Editor's Notes